Utah statutes.
13-2-1.   Consumer protection division established -- Functions.

(1)  There is established within the Department of Commerce the Division of Consumer Protection.

(2)  The division shall administer and enforce the following:

(a)  Chapter 5, Unfair Practices Act;

(b)  Chapter 10a, Music Licensing Practices Act;

(c)  Chapter 11, Utah Consumer Sales Practices Act;

(d)  Chapter 15, Business Opportunity Disclosure Act;

(e)  Chapter 20, New Motor Vehicles Warranties Act;

(f)  Chapter 21, Credit Services Organizations Act;

(g)  Chapter 22, Charitable Solicitations Act;

(h)  Chapter 23, Health Spa Services Protection Act;

(i)  Chapter 25a, Telephone and Facsimile Solicitation Act;

(j)  Chapter 26, Telephone Fraud Prevention Act;

(k)  Chapter 28, Prize Notices Regulation Act;

(l)  Chapter 32a, Pawnshop Transaction Information Act;

(m)  Chapter 34, Utah Postsecondary Proprietary School Act;

(n)  Chapter 41, Price Controls During Emergencies Act; and

(o)  Chapter 42, Uniform Debt-Management Services Act.

